Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Emergency Telecommunications; Board; Standards and Training; Basic and Enhanced 911

§ 19-5-351.
Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training; composition; terms; votes; Chairman and Vice Chairman; adoption of rules and regulations; meetings; reports; expenses.

There is hereby created the Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training, which shall consist of twelve (12) members and shall operate with the administrative assistance of the Office of Law Enforcement Planning, Department of Public Safety.

The Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training shall consist of one (1) representative from each of the following: the Law Enforcement Training Academy; the State Fire Academy; the Mississippi Chapter of the Associated Public Safety Communications Officers, Incorporated; the Mississippi Chapter of the National Emergency Number Association; the State Board of Health, Emergency Medical Services Division; the Mississippi Justice Information Center; the Mississippi Sheriff’s Association; the Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers’ Association; the Mississippi Fire Chief’s Association; the Mississippi Association of Chiefs of Police; the Mississippians for Emergency Medical Service Association; and a representative from the county wherein a nuclear facility is located. Each member organization shall have one (1) vote in the selection of training programs, for a total of twelve (12) votes. A majority vote shall decide all matters brought before the board.

The initial term limits of the board shall be according to the following:

Associated Public Safety Communications Officers’ appointee, one (1) year.

Mississippi Law Enforcement Officers’ Association appointee, one (1) year.

Mississippi Fire Chief’s Association appointee, one (1) year.

National Emergency Number Association appointee, two (2) years.

Mississippi Sheriff’s Association appointee, two (2) years.

Mississippians for Emergency Medical Service Association appointee, two (2) years.

Mississippi Association of Chiefs of Police appointee, two (2) years.

The county wherein is located a nuclear facility shall have one (1) appointee for two (2) years.

After the initial period, each appointee of the associations listed above shall serve for terms of four (4) years each, but may be replaced at any time by the association appointing such representative.

The remaining four (4) members of the board shall serve at the discretion of the director of the agency represented.

Members of the board shall serve without compensation but shall be entitled to receive reimbursement for any actual and reasonable expenses incurred as a necessary incident to such service, including mileage, as provided in Section 25-3-41, Mississippi Code of 1972.

There shall be a chairman and a vice chairman of the board elected by and from the membership of the board. The board shall adopt rules and regulations governing times and places for meetings and governing the manner of conducting its business, but the board shall meet at least every six (6) months.

The Director of the Office of the Board on Law Enforcement Standards and Training shall call an organizational meeting of the board not later than thirty (30) days after July 1, 1993.

The board shall report annually to the Governor and the Legislature on its activities and may make such other reports as it deems desirable.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 536, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 19-5-353.
Certification requirement for telecommunicators; minimum standards of training; suspension, cancellation, or recall of certificate; reprimands; notice, hearing and appeal; reapplication; penalties for employment of telecommunicator not duly qualified; other training not precluded [Repealed effective July 1, 2021].

The initial minimum standard of training for local public safety and 911 telecommunicators shall be determined by the Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training. All courses approved for minimum standards shall be taught by instructors certified by the course originator as instructors for such courses.

The minimum standards may be changed at any time by the Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training, but shall always include at least two (2) hours of training related to handling complaints and/or calls of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation of children as defined in Section 43-21-105, communicating with such victims and requiring the local public safety and 911 telecommunicators to contact the Department of Child Protection Services when human trafficking or commercial sexual exploitation is suspected.

Changes in the minimum standards may be made upon request from any bona fide public safety, emergency medical or fire organization operating within the State of Mississippi. Requests for change shall be in writing submitted to either the State Law Enforcement Training Academy; the State Fire Academy; the Mississippi Chapter of the Associated Public Safety Communications Officers, Incorporated; the Mississippi Chapter of the National Emergency Number Association; the Mississippi State Board of Health, Emergency Medical Services Division; the Mississippi Justice Information Center; the Mississippi Sheriff’s Association; the Mississippi Fire Chief’s Association; the Mississippi Association of Chiefs of Police; or Mississippians for Emergency Medical Services.

The minimum standards in no way are intended to restrict or limit any additional training which any department or agency may wish to employ, or any state or federal required training, but to serve as a basis or foundation for basic training.

Persons in the employment of any public safety, fire, 911 PSAP or emergency medical agency as a telecommunicator on July 1, 1993, shall have three (3) years to be certified in the minimum standards courses provided they have been employed by such agency for a period of more than one (1) year prior to July 1, 1993.

Persons having been employed by any public safety, fire, 911 PSAP or emergency medical agency as a telecommunicator for less than one (1) year prior to July 1, 1993, shall be required to have completed all the requirements for minimum training standards, as set forth in Sections 19-5-351 through 19-5-361, within one (1) year from July 1, 1993. Persons certified on or before July 1, 1993, in any course or courses chosen shall be given credit for these courses, provided the courses are still current and such persons can provide a course completion certificate.

Any person hired to perform the duties of a telecommunicator in any public safety, fire, 911 PSAP or emergency medical agency after July 1, 1993, shall complete the minimum training standards as set forth in Sections 19-5-351 through 19-5-361 within twelve (12) months of their employment or within twelve (12) months from the date that the Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training shall become operational.

Professional certificates remain the property of the board, and the board reserves the right to either reprimand the holder of a certificate, suspend a certificate upon conditions imposed by the board, or cancel and recall any certificate when:

The certificate was issued by administrative error;

The certificate was obtained through misrepresentation or fraud;

The holder has been convicted of any crime involving moral turpitude;

The holder has been convicted of a felony; or

Other due cause as determined by the board.

When the board believes there is a reasonable basis for either the reprimand, suspension, cancellation of, or recalling the certification of a telecommunicator, notice and opportunity for a hearing shall be provided. Any telecommunicator aggrieved by the findings and order of the board may file an appeal with the chancery court of the county in which such person is employed from the final order of the board. Any telecommunicator whose certification has been cancelled pursuant to Sections 19-5-351 through 19-5-361 may reapply for certification but not sooner than two (2) years after the date on which the order of the board canceling such certification became final.

Any state agency, political subdivision or “for-profit” ambulance, security or fire service company that employs a person as a telecommunicator who does not meet the requirements of Sections 19-5-351 through 19-5-361, or that employs a person whose certificate has been suspended or revoked under provisions of Sections 19-5-351 through 19-5-361, is prohibited from paying the salary of such person, and any person violating this subsection shall be personally liable for making such payment.

These minimum standards and time limitations shall in no way conflict with other state and federal training as may be required to comply with established laws or regulations.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 536, § 8; Laws, 2001, ch. 490, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 374, § 1; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2004, ch. 442, § 1; Laws, 2006, ch. 355, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 325, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 404, § 1; Laws, 2016, ch. 391, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 381, § 12, eff from and after July 1, 2018; Laws, 2019, ch. 420, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 2019.

§ 19-5-355.
Approval and completion of training; training expenses; issuance of certification.

When it shall be determined that training is required, a request for training shall be submitted to the Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training for approval of course, course location, estimated cost and base weekly salary of the telecommunicator to attend the course of instruction. Upon approval of training and successful completion of the training course, all expenses associated with the obtaining of such training shall be reimbursed. The local government entity or emergency service provider shall be reimbursed for the full salary and benefits of each telecommunicator completing such training.

Upon completion of any course required in these minimum training standards, each telecommunicator shall be issued a certificate which shall signify successful completion of such training. When all minimum standards training has been met, copies of certificates of course completion shall be forwarded to the Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training which will then issue “Certification of Minimum Standards” to such telecommunicator. Certifications shall be issued separately for law enforcement, fire and emergency medical service telecommunicators.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 536, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 1993.

§ 19-5-356.
Continuing education courses.

After any telecommunicator has received his or her initial minimum standard of training and has been issued the “Certification of Minimum Standards,” such telecommunicator shall complete forty-eight (48) hours of continuing education courses every three (3) years. The continuing education courses, required pursuant to this subsection, must be approved by the Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training.

The Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training shall reimburse each agency for the expense incurred by telecommunicators who attend approved continuing education courses as required by this section.

For purposes of this section, “telecommunicator” means any person engaged in or employed as a telecommunications operator by any public safety, fire or emergency medical agency whose primary responsibility is the receipt or processing of calls for emergency services provided by public safety, fire or emergency medical agencies or the dispatching of emergency services provided by public safety, fire or emergency medical agencies and who receives or disseminates information relative to emergency assistance by telephone or radio.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2010, ch. 560, § 14, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 19-5-357.
Telephone subscriber service charge to fund training; collection of charge; special fund; use of monies in fund; training expenses [Repealed effective July 1, 2021].

From and after July 1, 1993, a service charge of Five Cents (5¢) shall be placed on each subscriber service line within the State of Mississippi. This service charge shall apply equally to both private and business lines and shall apply to all service suppliers operating within the State of Mississippi. This subscriber service charge level shall be reviewed periodically to determine if the service charge level is adequate or excessive, and adjustments may be made accordingly.

Every billed service user shall be liable for any service charge imposed under this section until it has been paid to the service supplier. The duty of the service supplier to collect any such service charge shall commence upon the date of its implementation. Any such minimum standards telephone service charge shall be added to, and may be stated separately in, the billing by the service supplier to the service user.

The service supplier shall have no obligation to take any legal action to enforce the collection of any emergency telephone service charge. However, the service supplier shall annually provide the Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training with a list of the amount uncollected, together with the names and addresses of those service users who carry a balance that can be determined by the service supplier to be nonpayment of such service charge. The service charge shall be collected at the same time as the tariff rate in accordance with the regular billing practice of the service supplier. Good faith compliance by the service supplier with this provision shall constitute a complete defense to any legal action which may result from the service supplier’s determination of nonpayment and/or the identification of service users in connection therewith.

The amounts collected by the service supplier attributable to the minimum standards telephone service charge shall be deposited monthly into a special fund hereby created in the State Treasury. The amount of service charge collected each month by the service supplier shall be remitted to the special fund no later than sixty (60) days after the close of the month. A return, in such form as prescribed by the Department of Revenue, shall be filed with the Department of Revenue, together with a remittance of the amount of service charge collected payable to the special fund. The service supplier shall maintain records of the amount of service charge collected for a period of at least three (3) years from date of collection. From the gross receipts to be remitted to the special fund, the service supplier shall be entitled to retain as an administrative fee, an amount equal to one percent (1%) thereof. This service charge is a state fee and is not subject to any sales, use, franchise, income, excise or any other tax, fee or assessment, and shall not be considered revenue of the service supplier for any purpose. All administrative provisions of the Mississippi Sales Tax Law, including those which fix damages, penalties and interest for nonpayment of taxes and for noncompliance with the provisions of such chapter, and all other duties and requirements imposed upon taxpayers, shall apply to all persons liable for fees under the provisions of this chapter, and the Commissioner of Revenue shall exercise all the power and authority and perform all the duties with respect to taxpayers under this chapter as are provided in the Mississippi Sales Tax Law except where there is a conflict, then the provisions of this chapter shall control.

The proceeds generated by the minimum standards service charge shall primarily be used by the board pursuant to legislative appropriation to fund the minimum standards training program for public safety telecommunicators within the State of Mississippi. These funds shall be applied on a first-come first-served basis, which shall be determined by the date of application. All city, county and state public safety telecommunicators, including those employed by city and/or county supported ambulance services and districts, shall be eligible to receive these funds to meet minimum standards training requirements. No “for-profit” ambulance, security or fire service company operating in the private sector shall be qualified to receive these minimum standards training funds unless the company is on contract with a local government to provide primary emergency response. Law enforcement officers, fire and emergency medical personnel who are used as part-time or “fill-in” telecommunicators shall also be eligible to receive funding for this minimum standards training, provided they serve at least eight (8) hours per month as a telecommunicator. However, emergency medical personnel who are used as part-time or “fill-in” telecommunicators and are employed by any for-profit ambulance company operating in the private sector shall be eligible to receive funding for the minimum standards training, provided they serve at least twenty (20) hours per week as a telecommunicator. These funds may also be expended by the Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training to administer the minimum standards program for such things as personnel, office equipment, computer software, supplies and other necessary expenses.

The Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training shall be authorized to reimburse any public safety agency or emergency medical service for meals, lodging, travel, course fees and salary during the time spent training, upon successful completion of such course. Funds may also be expended to train certain individuals to become certified instructors of the various courses included in these minimum standards in order to conduct training within the State of Mississippi.

If the proceeds generated by the minimum standards service charge exceed the amount of monies necessary to fund the service, the Board of Emergency Telecommunications Standards and Training may authorize such excess funds to be available for advanced training, upgraded training and recertification of instructors. Any funds remaining at the close of any fiscal year shall not lapse into the State General Fund but shall be carried over to the next fiscal year to be used as a beginning balance for the fiscal requirements of such year.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 536, § 10; Laws, 1998, ch. 458, § 3; Laws, 2001, ch. 490, § 2; Laws, 2003, ch. 374, § 2; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2004, ch. 442, § 2; Laws, 2006, ch. 355, § 2; Laws, 2010, ch. 325, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 404, § 2; Laws, 2016, ch. 391, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2016; Laws, 2018, ch. 381, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 19-5-359.
Requirement of service suppliers and other parties to provide access to basic or enhanced 911 service; time to comply [Repealed effective July 1, 2021].

Any service supplier operating within the State of Mississippi shall be required to provide access to the locally designated PSAP by dialing the three (3) digits “911” from any telephone subscriber line within such service area. Where technically available, each service supplier shall, at a county’s request, provide “Enhanced 911” services. Where this capability does not technically exist, “Basic 911” shall be available as a minimum.

From and after December 31, 1993, any person, corporation or entity operating a “shared tenant service” type of telephone system shall be required to provide as a minimum the location and telephone number information for each and every extension or user on such “shared tenant” system to the regulated local exchange telephone service provider where the service provider can utilize such information in the delivery of “Enhanced 911” emergency telephone service. This information shall consist of data in a format that is compatible with the service supplier’s requirements in order to provide such location and telephone number information automatically in the event a call to 911 is placed from such a system. It shall be the responsibility of the operator or provider of “STS” telephone services to maintain the data pertaining to each extension operating on such system.

Any CMRS providers operating within the State of Mississippi shall be required to have all trunks or service lines supplying all cellular sites and personal communications network sites contain the word “cellular” in the service supplier listing for each trunk or service line to facilitate operator identification of cellular and PCN telephone calls placed to 911.

Any service suppliers engaged in the offering or operating of “Centrex” or “ESSX” telephone service within the State of Mississippi shall cause the actual location of all extensions operating in this service to be displayed at the PSAP whenever a 911 call is placed from said extension. This feature shall not be required in areas where Enhanced 911 is not in operation but shall be required should such area upgrade to Enhanced 911 service.

Any local exchange telephone service suppliers offering “quick-serve” or “soft” dial tone shall provide address location information to the PSAP operating in the area where the “quick-serve” or “soft” dial tone is in operation so that the PSAP may have this address information displayed should a call to 911 be placed from such location. It shall be the responsibility of the service supplier to determine in which emergency service number area the “quick-serve” or “soft” dial tone is located.

Any service suppliers operating within the State of Mississippi and providing Enhanced 911 telephone service shall have a reasonable time period, not to exceed five (5) years, to comply with data and operational standards as they are set forth by the National Emergency Number Association. This time period shall apply to data format, equipment supplied for PSAP use and for the length of time required for data updates relating to service user address information, emergency service number updates and other data updates as may be required.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 536, § 11; Laws, 1994, ch. 321, § 1; Laws, 1994, ch. 484, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 531, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 569, § 9; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 626, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2003, ch. 367, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 593, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2010, ch. 560, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2014, ch. 387, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2014; reenacted without change, Laws 2018, ch. 381, § 10, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 19-5-361.
911 service suppliers entitled to same limitations of liability as provided to state, state agencies and local governments [Repealed effective July 1, 2021].

Any Emergency 911 service supplier, Emergency 911 Voice over Internet Protocol service supplier, and Emergency 911 CMRS provider operating within the State of Mississippi, its employees, directors, officers, agents and subcontractors, shall be entitled to receive the limitations of liability as provided to the state, or any agency or local government of the state, pursuant to Section 11-46-15, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1993, ch. 536, § 12; Laws, 1998, ch. 531, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2001, ch. 569, § 10; reenacted without change, Laws, 2002, ch. 626, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2003, ch. 367, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2007, ch. 593, § 11; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2010, ch. 560, § 11; reenacted without change, Laws, 2014, ch. 387, § 11, eff from and after July 1, 2014; reenacted without change, Laws, 2018, ch. 381, § 11, eff and after July 1, 2018.